Washington statutes.
RCW 41.32.025

Department's power to determine eligibility.

The department is empowered within the limits of this chapter and, with regard to restoration of service credit under RCW 41.50.165(2), to decide on all questions of eligibility covering membership, service credit, and benefits.

[ 1994 c 197 s 13; 1991 c 35 s 35; 1955 c 274 s 3; 1947 c 80 s 16; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 4995-35. Prior: 1941 c 97 s 2, part; 1937 c 221 s 3, part; Rem. Supp. 1941 s 4995-3, part. Formerly RCW 41.32.160.]

NOTES:

Intent—Severability—Effective date—1994 c 197: See notes following RCW 41.50.165.

Intent—1991 c 35: See note following RCW 41.26.005.